Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.635

Motor vehicle transportation service—Unauthorized use of state vehicles—Procedure—Disciplinary action.

(1) The governor, acting through the department and any other appropriate agency or agencies as he or she may direct, is empowered to utilize all reasonable means for detecting the unauthorized use of state owned motor vehicles, including the execution of agreements with the state patrol for compliance enforcement. Whenever such illegal use is discovered which involves a state employee, the employing agency shall proceed as provided by law to establish the amount, extent, and dollar value of any such use, including an opportunity for notice and hearing for the employee involved. When such illegal use is so established, the agency shall assess its full cost of any mileage illegally used and shall recover such amounts by deductions from salary or allowances due to be paid to the offending official or employee by other means. Recovery of costs by the state under this subsection shall not preclude disciplinary or other action by the appropriate appointing authority or employing agency under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Any willful and knowing violation of any provision of RCW 43.19.560 through 43.19.620, * 43.41.130 and * 43.41.140 shall subject the state official or employee committing such violation to disciplinary action by the appropriate appointing or employing agency. Such disciplinary action may include, but shall not be limited to, suspension without pay, or termination of employment in the case of repeated violations.

(3) Any casual or inadvertent violation of RCW 43.19.560 through 43.19.620, * 43.41.130 and * 43.41.140 may subject the state official or employee committing such violation to disciplinary action by the appropriate appointing authority or employing agency. Such disciplinary action may include, but need not be limited to, suspension without pay.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 236; 2009 c 549 s 5071; 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s 17.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.41.130 and 43.41.140 were recodified as RCW 43.19.622 and 43.19.623, respectively, pursuant to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 325.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 167: See note following RCW 43.19.560.